Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.715.050

Student transportation allocation—Additional uses under emergency.

RCW 28A.160.185 governs school operation and management under RCW 28A.715.020 and applies to state-tribal compact schools established under this chapter.

[ 2021 c 234 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2021 c 234: See notes following RCW 28A.160.185.